North Dakota, session 69, HB1174.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 20.1-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Educational and community outreach programs.
The department may establish educational and community outreach programs to promote public
understanding of fisheries and wildlife management and promote interest in pursuing careers in fields
employed by the department. The director may establish programs and determine participation
eligibility, including the direct participation in job shadowing of field activities and ride alongs.

H. B. NO. 1174 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1174.
House Vote: Yeas 87 Nays 0 Absent 7
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 0 Absent 3
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State